Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202646-1304
Report required; Department of Water, Energy, and Environment; duties.

The Department of Water, Energy, and Environment shall prepare a report outlining the extent of ground water quality monitoring conducted by natural resources districts during the preceding calendar year. The department shall analyze the data collected for the purpose of determining whether or not ground water quality is degrading or improving and shall present the results electronically to the Natural Resources Committee of the Legislature beginning December 1, 2001, and each year thereafter. The districts shall submit in a timely manner all ground water quality monitoring data collected to the department or its designee. The department shall use the data submitted by the districts in conjunction with all other readily available and compatible data for the purposes of the annual ground water quality trend analysis.

Laws 2001, LB 329, § 11;

Laws 2012, LB782, § 56;

Laws 2019, LB302, § 51;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 267.